Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.470

Penalties imposed upon directors and officers.

Each director and officer of a corporation, domestic or foreign, who fails or refuses within the time prescribed by this chapter, to answer truthfully and fully any interrogatories propounded to him or her by the secretary of state in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, which is known to such officer or director to be false in any material respect, shall be deemed to be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall be fined in an amount not to exceed five hundred dollars on each count.

[ 2015 c 176 s 4133; 2011 c 336 s 669; 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 94.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.